Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.070

Conduct of hearing—Termination of proceedings.

Whenever a hearing is held under RCW 35.101.030, the legislative authority shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action. The legislative authority may continue the hearing from time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by the lodging businesses in the area which would pay a majority of the proposed charges.

[ 2003 c 148 s 7.]